Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-681
Public hearing; evidence presented.

At the hearing provided for in section 46-680, the applicant shall present all hydrological data and other evidence supporting its application. All interested parties shall be allowed to testify and present evidence relative to the application.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 7.